Washington statutes.
RCW 6.25.020

Time for granting.

The plaintiff at the time of commencing an action, or at any time afterward before judgment, may have the property of the defendant, or that of any one or more of several defendants, attached in the manner prescribed in this chapter, as security for the satisfaction of such judgment as the plaintiff may recover.

[ 1987 c 442 s 802; 1886 p 39 s 1; RRS s 647. Prior: Code 1881 ss 174-192; 1877 pp 35-40; 1873 pp 43-50; 1871 pp 9, 10; 1869 pp 41-47; 1863 pp 112-120; 1860 pp 30-36; 1854 pp 155-162. Formerly RCW 7.12.010.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 64.